Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5714.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 125. The portion of highway M-553 beginning at the intersection of highway M-553 and Division Street in the city of Marquette and continuing south to the intersection of M-553 and County Road 480 in Sands Township shall be known as the "Jack Rantanen Memorial Highway".